Oklahoma, session 2025, SB834.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-113 of Title 26, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section, “open primary” or “jungle primary”


shall mean any voting system whereby a voter may vote for a


candidate in a primary election without regard to the voter’s party


affiliation, and all candidates for public office who qualify for a


primary may be voted on without regard to the candidate’s party


affiliation.


B. No election conducted by the State Election Board, a county


election board, or any municipality authorized to conduct elections


in this state shall use an open primary or jungle primary.

Req. No. 260 Page 1


C. Any existing or future ordinance enacted or adopted by a


county, municipality, or any other local government entity which is


in conflict with this section shall be deemed void. Any election


for any public office in this state conducted under a voting system


prohibited by this section shall be deemed void.


D. The Secretary of the State Election Board shall have the


authority to bring a civil action in a court of competent


jurisdiction for such declaratory or injunctive relief as is


necessary to carry out this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-260 TEK 1/19/2025 5:44:19 AM

























Req. No. 260 Page 2